Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.445

Death investigations account—Disbursal.

There is established an account in the state treasury referred to as the "death investigations account" which shall exist for the purpose of receiving, holding, investing, and disbursing funds appropriated or provided in RCW 70.58A.560 and any moneys appropriated or otherwise provided thereafter.

Moneys in the death investigations account shall be disbursed by the state treasurer once every year on December 31 and at any other time determined by the treasurer. The treasurer shall make disbursements to: The state toxicology laboratory, counties for the cost of autopsies, the state patrol for providing partial funding for the state dental identification system, the criminal justice training commission for training county coroners, medical examiners and their staff, and the state forensic investigations council. Funds from the death investigations account may be appropriated during the 2013-2015 and 2019-2021 fiscal biennia for the activities of the state crime laboratory within the Washington state patrol.

[ 2019 c 415 s 968; 2019 c 148 s 35; 2018 c 299 s 922; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 970; 2016 sp.s. c 36 s 931; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 979; 2005 c 166 s 3; 1997 c 454 s 901; 1995 c 398 s 9; 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 21; 1991 c 176 s 4; 1986 c 31 s 2; 1985 c 57 s 41; 1983 1st ex.s. c 16 s 18.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2019 c 148 s 35 and by 2019 c 415 s 968, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Effective date—2019 c 415: See note following RCW 28B.20.476.

Effective date—Rule-making authority—2019 c 148: See RCW 70.58A.901 and 70.58A.902.

Effective date—2018 c 299: See note following RCW 43.41.433.

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 1: See note following RCW 43.41.455.

Effective date—2016 sp.s. c 36: See note following RCW 18.20.430.

Effective dates—2013 2nd sp.s. c 4: See note following RCW 2.68.020.

Severability—1997 c 454: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1997 c 454 s 1801.]

Effective date—1997 c 454: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 20, 1997]." [ 1997 c 454 s 1802.]

Effective dates—Severability—1991 sp.s. c 13: See notes following RCW 18.08.240.

Effective date—1986 c 31: "This act shall take effect July 1, 1986." [ 1986 c 31 s 3.]

Effective date—1985 c 57: See note following RCW 18.04.105.

Effective date—1983 1st ex.s. c 16: See RCW 43.103.901.